District of Columbia statutes.
25-771

Reporting.

(a)

Before the 21st day of each month, a licensee under a manufacturer’s license shall furnish to the Board, on a form to be prescribed by the Mayor, a statement, under penalties of perjury, showing the quantity of each kind of alcoholic beverage, except beer, manufactured during the preceding calendar month. For the purposes of this section, alcoholic beverages shall not be considered as manufactured until they are ready for sale.

(b)

Twice a year, a licensee under a wholesaler’s or retailer’s license shall furnish to the Board, on a form to be prescribed by the Mayor, a statement, under penalties of perjury, showing:

(1)

The quantity of each kind of beverage, except beer, purchased by the license holder during the preceding 6 calendar months;

(2)

The date of each such purchase;

(3)

The name of the person from whom purchased, including the license number of the vendor, if licensed hereunder; and

(4)

The quantity and kind of beverages in each purchase.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 332, ch. 4, § 22
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 2
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(8), 30 DCR 5927
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298,§ 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 6(e), 48 DCR 7612
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 26(b)(2), 51 DCR 881
1981 Ed., § 25-771.
1973 Ed., § 25-123.
D.C. Law 14-42, in subsec. (a), substituted “calendar month” for “month”.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(e) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).